The legume-rhizobial interaction results in the formation of symbiotic nodules in which rhizobia fix nitrogen. During the process of symbiosis, reactive oxygen species (ROS) are generated. Thus, the response of rhizobia to ROS is important for successful nodulation and nitrogen fixation. In this study, we investigated how Azorhizobium caulinodans, a rhizobium that forms both root and stem nodules on its host plant, regulates ROS resistance. We found that in-frame deletions of a gene encoding the putative catalase-peroxidase katG or a gene encoding a LysR-family regulatory protein, oxyR, exhibited increased sensitivity to H2O2 We then showed that OxyR positively regulated katG expression in an H2O2-independent fashion. Furthermore, we found that deletion of katG or oxyR led to significant reduction in the number of stem nodules and decrease of nitrogen fixation capacities in symbiosis. Our results revealed that KatG and OxyR are not only critical for antioxidant defense in vitro, but also important for nodule formation and nitrogen fixation during interaction with plant hosts.-##-we investigated how Azorhizobium caulinodans regulates ROS resistance. We found that in-frame deletions of a gene encoding the putative catalase-peroxidase katG or a gene encoding a LysR-family regulatory protein, oxyR, exhibited increased sensitivity to H2O2 We then showed that OxyR positively regulated katG expression in an H2O2-independent fashion 
Chemotaxis can provide bacteria with competitive advantages for survival in complex environments. The CheZ chemotaxis protein is a phosphatase, affecting the flagellar motor in -##-We identified a CheZ-like protein among Alphaproteobacteria functioning in chemotaxis and the A. caulinodans-S. rostrata symbiosis 
Spatiotemporal regulation of cell polarity plays a role in many fundamental processes in bacteria and often relies on 'landmark' proteins which recruit the corresponding clients to their designated position. Here, we explored the localization of two multi-protein complexes, the polar flagellar motor and the chemotaxis array, in Shewanella putrefaciens CN-32. We demonstrate that polar positioning of the flagellar system, but not of the chemotaxis system, depends on the GTPase FlhF. In contrast, the chemotaxis array is recruited by a transmembrane protein which we identified as the functional ortholog of Vibrio cholerae HubP. Mediated by its periplasmic N-terminal LysM domain, SpHubP exhibits an FlhF-independent localization pattern during cell cycle similar to its Vibrio counterpart and also has a role in proper chromosome segregation. In addition, while not affecting flagellar positioning, SpHubP is crucial for normal flagellar function and is involved in type IV pili-mediated twitching motility. We hypothesize that a group of HubP/FimV homologs, characterized by a rather conserved N-terminal periplasmic section required for polar targeting and a highly variable acidic cytoplasmic part, primarily mediating recruitment of client proteins, serves as polar markers in various bacterial species with respect to different cellular functions. -##-study demonstrate that polar positioning of the flagellar system, but not of the chemotaxis system, depends on the GTPase FlhF.
Shewanella putrefaciens CN-32 contains a single Type I-Fv CRISPR-Cas system which confers adaptive immunity against bacteriophage infection. Three Cas proteins (Cas6f, Cas7fv, Cas5fv) and mature CRISPR RNAs were shown to be required for the assembly of an interference complex termed Cascade. The Cas protein-CRISPR RNA interaction sites within this complex were identified via mass spectrometry. Additional Cas proteins, commonly described as large and small subunits, that are present in all other investigated Cascade structures, were not detected. We introduced this minimal Type I system in Escherichia coli and show that it provides heterologous protection against lambda phage. The absence of a large subunit suggests that the length of the crRNA might not be fixed and recombinant Cascade complexes with drastically shortened and elongated crRNAs were engineered. Size-exclusion chromatography and small-angle X-ray scattering analyses revealed that the number of Cas7fv backbone subunits is adjusted in these shortened and extended Cascade variants. Larger Cascade complexes can still confer immunity against lambda phage infection in E. coli Minimized Type I CRISPR-Cas systems expand our understanding of the evolution of Cascade assembly and diversity. Their adjustable crRNA length opens the possibility for customizing target DNA specificity.-##-Three Cas proteins (Cas6f, Cas7fv, Cas5fv) and mature CRISPR RNAs were shown to be required for the assembly of an interference complex termed Cascade. 
The capability of biofilm formation has a major impact on the industrial and biotechnological applications of -##-LrbS activates LrbA which further promotes the expression of lrbR in response to sodium lactate. (LrbS, Lrb, -LrbR)

Bactofilins are novel cytoskeleton proteins that are widespread in Gram-negative bacteria. Myxococcus xanthus, an important predatory soil bacterium, possesses four bactofilins of which one, BacM (Mxan_7475) plays an important role in cell shape maintenance. Electron and fluorescence light microscopy, as well as studies using over-expressed, purified BacM, indicate that this protein polymerizes in vivo and in vitro into ~3 nm wide filaments that further associate into higher ordered fibers of about 10 nm. Here we use a multipronged approach combining secondary structure determination, molecular modeling, biochemistry, and genetics to identify and characterize critical molecular elements that enable BacM to polymerize. Our results indicate that the bactofilin-determining domain DUF583 folds into an extended β-sheet structure, and we hypothesize a left-handed β-helix with polymerization into 3 nm filaments primarily via patches of hydrophobic amino acid residues. These patches form the interface allowing head-to-tail polymerization during filament formation. Biochemical analyses of these processes show that folding and polymerization occur across a wide variety of conditions and even in the presence of chaotropic agents such as one molar urea. Together, these data suggest that bactofilins are comprised of a structure unique to cytoskeleton proteins, which enables robust polymerization.-##-BacM of Myxococcus xanthus forms an extended beta-sheet structure likely mediated by hydrophobic interactions 
Myxococcus xanthus has two bacterial protein-tyrosine (BY) kinases, BtkA and BtkB. Autophosphorylation in C-terminal tyrosine-rich clusters and poly(Glu, Tyr) kinase activities of cytoplasmic catalytic domains of BtkA and BtkB were activated by the intracellular juxtamembrane regions of the second transmembrane helices. Protein kinase activity against poly(Glu, Tyr) of cytoplasmic fragment of BtkB (CF-BtkB) containing an activator region was not inhibited by serine/threonine protein kinase inhibitors. However, addition of tyrosine protein kinase inhibitors, genistein and 4-amino-5-(4-chlorophenyl)-7-(t-butyl)pyrazolo[3,4-d]pyrimidine (PP2), at a concentration of 0.2 mM, inhibited the CF-BtkB kinase activity by 20 and 64%, respectively. A CF-BtkB mutant constructed by replacing all C-terminal tyrosine residues with phenylalanines, did not undergo autophosphorylation. Further, this mutation did not significantly affect poly(Glu, Tyr) kinase activity, suggesting that M. xanthus BtkB kinase activity is not dependent on autophosphorylation in the C-terminal tyrosine cluster. A conserved motif (ExxRxxR) of BY kinases is involved in the self-association of catalytic domains of BY kinases, necessary to accomplish trans-phosphorylation. An ExxRxxR motif mutant of CF-BtkB led to loss of autophosphorylation and poly(Glu, Tyr) kinase activities. These observations provide insights into the regulation mechanism of M. xanthus BY kinase activity. -##-Data suggest BtkB exhibits conserved amino acid motifs similar to BtkA; BtkB is activated by autophosphorylation of cytoplasmic catalytic domain; activity is not dependent on autophosphorylation in C-terminal tyrosine. 
Here we attempted to identify the downstream target of the DifE histidine kinase in the regulation of exopolysaccharide (EPS) production in the Gram-negative bacterium Myxococcus xanthus. This bacterium is an important model system for the studies of Type IV pilus (T4P) because it is motile by social (S) motility which is powered by T4P retraction. EPS is critical for S motility because it is the preferred anchor for T4P retraction in this bacterium. Previous studies identified the Dif chemosensory pathway as crucial for the regulation of EPS production. However, the downstream target of the DifE kinase in this pathway was unknown. In this study, EpsW, an orphan and single-domain response regulator (RR), was identified as a potential DifE target first by bioinformatics. Subsequent experiments demonstrated that epsW is essential for EPS biosynthesis in vivo and that EpsW is directly phosphorylated by DifE in vitro. Targted mutagenesis of epsW suggests that EpsW is unlikely the terminal RR of the Dif pathway. We propose instead that EpsW is an intermediary in a multistep phosphorelay that regulates EPS in M. xanthus. -##-EpsW, an orphan and single-domain response regulator (RR), was identified as a potential DifE target first by bioinformatics.
Type IV pili (T4P) are ubiquitous bacterial cell surface structures, involved in processes such as twitching motility, biofilm formation, bacteriophage infection, surface attachment, virulence, and natural transformation. T4P are assembled by machinery that can be divided into the outer membrane pore complex, the alignment complex that connects components in the inner and outer membrane, and the motor complex in the inner membrane and cytoplasm. Here, we characterize the inner membrane platform protein PilC, the cytosolic assembly ATPase PilB of the motor complex, and the cytosolic nucleotide-binding protein PilM of the alignment complex of the T4P machinery ofMyxococcus xanthus PilC was purified as a dimer and reconstituted into liposomes. PilB was isolated as a monomer and bound ATP in a non-cooperative manner, but PilB fused to Hcp1 ofPseudomonas aeruginosaformed a hexamer and bound ATP in a cooperative manner. Hexameric but not monomeric PilB bound to PilC reconstituted in liposomes, and this binding stimulated PilB ATPase activity. PilM could only be purified when it was stabilized by a fusion with a peptide corresponding to the first 16 amino acids of PilN, supporting an interaction between PilM and PilN(1-16). PilM-N(1-16) was isolated as a monomer that bound but did not hydrolyze ATP. PilM interacted directly with PilB, but only with PilC in the presence of PilB, suggesting an indirect interaction. We propose that PilB interacts with PilC and with PilM, thus establishing the connection between the alignment and the motor complex. -##-The type IV pilus assembly ATPase PilB of Myxococcus xanthus interacts with the inner membrane platform protein PilC and the nucleotide-binding protein PilM. 
Extracytoplasmic function sigma factors represent the third pillar of signal-transduction mechanisms in bacteria. The variety of stimuli they recognize and mechanisms of action they use have allowed their classification into more than 50 groups. We have characterized CorE2 from Myxococcus xanthus, which belongs to group ECF44 and upregulates the expression of two genes when it is activated by cadmium and zinc. Sigma factors of this group contain a Cys-rich domain (CRD) at the C terminus which is essential for detecting metals. Point mutations at the six Cys residues of the CRD have revealed the contribution of each residue to CorE2 activity. Some of them are essential, while others are either dispensable or their mutations only slightly affect the activity of the protein. However, importantly, mutation of Cys174 completely shifts the specificity of CorE2 from cadmium to copper, indicating that the Cys arrangement of the CRD determines the metal specificity. Moreover, the conserved CxC motif located between the σ2 domain and the σ4.2 region has also been found to be essential for activity. The results presented here contribute to our understanding of the mechanism of action of metal-dependent sigma factors and help to define new common features of the members of this group of regulators.-##-Point mutations at the six Cys residues of the CRD have revealed the contribution of each residue to CorE2 activity. However, importantly, mutation of Cys174 completely shifts the specificity of CorE2 from cadmium to copper, indicating that the Cys arrangement of the CRD determines the metal specificity

Generally, the second messenger bis-(3'-5')-cyclic dimeric GMP (c-di-GMP) regulates the switch between motile and sessile lifestyles in bacteria. Here, we show that c-di-GMP is an essential regulator of multicellular development in the social bacterium Myxococcus xanthus. In response to starvation, M. xanthus initiates a developmental program that culminates in formation of spore-filled fruiting bodies. We show that c-di-GMP accumulates at elevated levels during development and that this increase is essential for completion of development whereas excess c-di-GMP does not interfere with development. MXAN3735 (renamed DmxB) is identified as a diguanylate cyclase that only functions during development and is responsible for this increased c-di-GMP accumulation. DmxB synthesis is induced in response to starvation, thereby restricting DmxB activity to development. DmxB is essential for development and functions downstream of the Dif chemosensory system to stimulate exopolysaccharide accumulation by inducing transcription of a subset of the genes encoding proteins involved in exopolysaccharide synthesis. The developmental defects in the dmxB mutant are non-cell autonomous and rescued by co-development with a strain proficient in exopolysaccharide synthesis, suggesting reduced exopolysaccharide accumulation as the causative defect in this mutant. The NtrC-like transcriptional regulator EpsI/Nla24, which is required for exopolysaccharide accumulation, is identified as a c-di-GMP receptor, and thus a putative target for DmxB generated c-di-GMP. Because DmxB can be-at least partially-functionally replaced by a heterologous diguanylate cyclase, these results altogether suggest a model in which a minimum threshold level of c-di-GMP is essential for the successful completion of multicellular development in M. xanthus.-##-Because DmxB can be-at least partially-functionally replaced by a heterologous diguanylate cyclase, these results altogether suggest a model in which a minimum threshold level of c-di-GMP is essential for the successful completion of multicellular development in M. xanthus

Isovaleryl coenzyme A (IV-CoA) performs a crucial role during development and fruiting-body formation in myxobacteria, which is reflected in the existence of a de novo biosynthetic pathway that is highly upregulated when leucine, the common precursor of IV-CoA, is limited. The final step in de novo IV-CoA biosynthesis is catalyzed by AibC, a medium-chain dehydrogenase/reductase. Here, the crystal structure of AibC from Myxococcus xanthus refined to 2.55 Å resolution is presented. The protein adopts two different conformations in the crystal lattice, which is a consequence of partial interaction with the purification tag. Based on this structure, it is suggested that AibC most probably uses a Zn(2+)-supported catalytic mechanism in which NADPH is preferred over NADH. Taken together, this study reveals structural details of the alternative IV-CoA-producing pathway in myxobacteria, which may serve as a base for further biotechnological research and biofuel production.-##-Crystal structure of AibC, a reductase involved in alternative de novo isovaleryl coenzyme A biosynthesis in Myxococcus xanthus, has been reported. 
None: Lost traits can reevolve, but the probability of trait reversion depends partly on a trait's genetic complexity. Myxobacterial fruiting body development is a complex trait controlled by the small RNA (sRNA) Pxr, which blocks development under conditions of nutrient abundance. In developmentally proficient strains of Myxococcus xanthus, starvation relaxes the inhibition by Pxr, thereby allowing development to proceed. In contrast, the lab-evolved strain OC does not develop because it fails to relay an early starvation signal that alleviates inhibition by Pxr. A descendant of OC, strain PX, previously reevolved developmental proficiency via a mutation in pxr that inactivates its function. A single-colony screen was used to test whether reversion of OC to developmental proficiency occurs only by mutation of pxr or might also occur through alternative regulatory loci. Five spontaneous mutants of OC that exhibited restored development were isolated, and all five showed defects in Pxr synthesis, structure, or processing, including one that incurred an eight-nucleotide deletion in pxr Two mutations occurred in the σ IMPORTANCE: Many myxobacteria initiate a process of multicellular fruiting body development upon starvation, but key features of the regulatory network controlling the transition from growth to development remain obscure. Previous work with Myxococcus xanthus identified the first small RNA (sRNA) regulator (Pxr) known to serve as a gatekeeper in this life history transition, as it blocks development when nutrients are abundant. In the present study, a screen for spontaneous mutants of M. xanthus was developed that revealed a two-component system operon (encoding a histidine kinase and a σ-##-MXAN_1078 (named pxrR here) was found to positively regulate pxr transcription, presumably via the sigma(54) promoter of pxr.
Mg-##-the bacterial MxSafC exhibits excellent regioselectivity for para as well as for meta methylation, depending on the substrate's characteristics.
The ability to recognize close kin confers survival benefits on single-celled microbes that live in complex and changing environments. Microbial kinship detection relies on perceptible cues that reflect relatedness between individuals, although the mechanisms underlying recognition in natural populations remain poorly understood. In myxobacteria, cells identify related individuals through a polymorphic cell surface receptor, TraA. Recognition of compatible receptors leads to outer membrane exchange among clonemates and fitness consequences. Here, we investigated how a single receptor creates a diversity in recognition across myxobacterial populations. We first show that TraA requires its partner protein TraB to function in cell-cell adhesion. Recognition is shown to be -##-Data show that TraA requires TraB to form an active adhesin for self-recognition. In the absence of TraB, TraA localizes to the cell surface but does not function in cell- binding. TraA contains a predicted sorting motif, MYXO-CTERM, contributing to its cell surface display. TraB, with a beta-barrel and cell wall binding domain, may help anchor TraA to the cell envelop during adhesion and outer membrane exchange. 
The gene encoding a novel acidic lipoxygenase from Myxococcus xanthus DK1622 (accession: WP_011551853.1) was cloned into vector pET-28a and expressed in Escherichia coli BL21(DE3). The recombinant enzyme (rMxLOX), with a molecular weight of approximately 80 kDa, was purified to homogeneity using one-step nickel-affinity chromatography and showed an activity of 5.6 × 10-##-Expression, purification, and characterization of a novel acidic Lipoxygenase (LOX) from Myxococcus xanthus has been reported. 
Polyphosphate kinase 1 (Ppk1) catalyzes reverse transfer of the terminal phosphate from ATP to form polyphosphate (polyP) and from polyP to form ATP, and is responsible for the synthesis of most of cellular polyPs. When Ppk1 from Myxococcus xanthus was incubated with 0.2 mM polyP-##-Ppk1 catalyzed the transfer of a phosphate group between ADP molecules yielding ATP and AMP, thus exhibiting adenylate kinase activity.
Chaperonin groEL genes are duplicated in approximately 20% of bacteria, and the duplicates are differentially transcribed due to their divergent functions. The coordinated regulation of this differential transcription is as yet undetermined. In this study, we reported that the controlling inverted repeat of chaperone expression (CIRCE) element (the HrcA-binding site located upstream of the promoter) evolved for the transcriptional regulation of duplicate groELs. CIRCE composition and locations were found to be phylogenetically conserved in bacterial taxa. Myxococcus xanthus DK1622 has two CIRCE elements (CIRCE1-##-Negative HrcA and positive sigma32 regulators coordinate the transcription of duplicate groELs (groEL)

Adenylate kinase (Adk) plays a critical role in energy metabolism and adaptation of bacteria to environmental stresses. We have previously shown that Myxococcus xanthus expresses polyphosphate kinase 1 (Ppk1) that also has Adk activity in the absence of polyphosphates. In this study, we investigated the Adk activity of the other two M. xanthus enzymes, AdkA and AdkB. The activity of AdkA was increased by dithiothreitol (DTT), which also enhanced enzyme stability. Site-directed mutagenesis of three cysteine residues (C130, C150, and C153) present in the LID domain of AdkA revealed that the Adk activity and stability of C150S and C153S mutants were not affected by DTT addition, suggesting formation of a disulfide bond between C150 and C153 in AdkA. The Km of AdkA for AMP was 8 and 17 times lower than that for ADP and ATP, respectively. AdkB is a polyphosphate kinase 2 (Ppk2) homolog lacking the Ppk2 middle region and, consequently, Ppk activity. According to our analysis, AdkB also had Adk activity and its affinity for substrates was higher than that of AdkA. Thus, M. xanthus expresses three enzymes, AdkA, AdkB, and Ppk1, with Adk activity, which may function to support energy metabolism of the bacteria in different environmental conditions.-##-M. xanthus expresses three enzymes, AdkA, AdkB, and Ppk1, with Adk activity, which may function to support energy metabolism of the bacteria in different environmental conditions.

TonB-dependent transporters (TBDTs) are ubiquitous outer membrane β-barrel proteins that import nutrients and bacteriocins across the outer membrane in a proton motive force-dependent manner, by directly connecting to the ExbB/ExbD/TonB system in the inner membrane. Here, we show that the TBDT Oar in Myxococcus xanthus is required for secretion of a protein, protease PopC, to the extracellular milieu. PopC accumulates in the periplasm before secretion across the outer membrane, and the proton motive force has a role in secretion to the extracellular milieu. Reconstitution experiments in Escherichia coli demonstrate that secretion of PopC across the outer membrane not only depends on Oar but also on the ExbB/ExbD/TonB system. Our results indicate that TBDTs and the ExbB/ExbD/TonB system may have roles not only in import processes but also in secretion of proteins.-##-A TonB-dependent transporter is required for secretion of protease PopC across the bacterial outer membrane. 
AuaA is a membrane-bound farnesyltransferase from the myxobacterium Stigmatella aurantiaca involved in the biosynthesis of aurachins. Like other known membrane-bound aromatic prenyltransferases, AuaA contains two conserved aspartate-rich motifs. Several amino acids in the first motif NXxxDxxxD were proposed to be responsible for prenyl diphosphate binding via metal ions like Mg(2+). Site-directed mutagenesis experiments demonstrated in this study that asparagine, but not the arginine residue in NRxxDxxxD, is important for the enzyme activity of AuaA, differing from the importance of NQ or ND residues in the NQxxDxxxD or NDxxDxxxD motifs observed in some membrane-bound prenyltransferases. The second motif of known membrane-bound prenyltransferases was proposed to be involved in the binding of their aromatic substrates. KDIxDxEGD, also found in AuaA, had been previously speculated to be characteristic for binding of flavonoids or homogenisate. Site-directed mutagenesis experiments with AuaA showed that KDIxDxEGD was critical for the enzyme activity. However, this motif is very likely not specific for flavonoid or homogenisate prenyltransferases, because none of the tested flavonoids was accepted by AuaA or its mutant R53A in the presence of farnesyl, geranyl or dimethylallyl diphosphate.-##-
Direct electrochemistry and bioelectrocatalysis of a newly discovered C-19 steroid 1α-hydroxylase (CYP260A1) from the myxobacterium Sorangium cellulosum So ce56 were investigated. CYP260A1 was immobilized on screen-printed graphite electrodes (SPE) modified with gold nanoparticles, stabilized by didodecyldimethylammonium bromide (SPE/DDAB/Au). Cyclic voltammograms in argon-saturated substrate free 0.1 M potassium phosphate buffer, pH 7.4, and in enzyme-substrate complex with androstenedione demonstrated a redox processes with a single redox couple of E(0') of -299 ± 16 mV and -297.5 ± 21 mV (vs. Ag/AgCl), respectively. CYP260A1 exhibited an electrocatalytic activity detected by an increase of the reduction current in the presence of dissolved oxygen and upon addition of the substrate (androstenedione) in the air-saturated buffer. The catalytic current of the enzyme correlated with substrate concentration in the electrochemical system and this dependence can be described by electrochemical Michaelis-Menten model. The products of CYP260A1-depended electrolysis at controlled working electrode potential of androstenedione were analyzed by mass-spectrometry. MS analysis revealed a mono-hydroxylated product of CYP260A1-dependent electrocatalytic reaction towards androstenedione.-##-CYP260A1 exhibited an electrocatalytic activity detected by an increase of the reduction current in the presence of dissolved oxygen and upon addition of the substrate (androstenedione) in the air-saturated buffer.

In this study, we report the crystal structure of the cytochrome P450 CYP260A1 (PDB 5LIV) from the myxobacterium Sorangium cellulosum So ce56. In addition, we investigated the hydroxylation of 11-deoxycorticosterone by CYP260A1 by reconstituting the enzyme with the surrogate redox partners adrenodoxin and adrenodoxin reductase. The major product of this steroid conversion was identified as 1α-hydroxy-11-deoxycorticosterone, a novel Δ4 C-21 steroidal derivative. Furthermore, we docked the substrate into the crystal structure and replaced Ser326, the residue responsible for substrate orientation, with asparagine and observed that the mutant S326N displayed higher activity and selectivity for the formation of 1α-hydroxy-11-deoxycorticosterone compared to the wild-type CYP260A1. Thus, our findings highlight the usefulness of the obtained crystal structure of CYP260A1 in identifying biotechnologically more efficient reactions.-##-Structural characterization of CYP260A1 from Sorangium cellulosum and its catalytic activity towards a mineralocorticoid has been reported. 
Oxidative biocatalytic reactions performed by cytochrome P450 enzymes (P450s) are of high interest for the chemical and pharmaceutical industries. CYP267B1 is a P450 enzyme from myxobacterium -##-The results demonstrate the ability of CYP267B1 to perform in-chain hydroxylations of medium-chain saturated fatty acids (decanoic acid, dodecanoic acid and tetradecanoic acid) and a regioselective hydroxylation of flavanone. The fatty acids are mono-hydroxylated at different in-chain positions, with decanoic acid displaying the highest regioselectivity towards omega-3 hydroxylation.

Tpt1 catalyzes the transfer of an internal 2'-monophosphate moiety (2'-PO-##-Study characterizes the Tpt1 enzyme from Runella slithyformis as a bona fide NAD+-dependent RNA 2'-phosphotransferase. Its biological activity relies on a conserved histidine and three conserved arginine that were shown to be essential for the in vivo activity of S. cerevisiae Tpt1 and E. coli KptA. 
Microbial pathogens that colonize multiple tissues commonly produce adhesive surface proteins that mediate attachment to cells and/or extracellular matrix in target organs. Many of these 'adhesins' bind to multiple ligands, complicating efforts to understand the role of each ligand-binding activity. Borrelia burgdorferi, the causative agent of Lyme disease, produces BBK32, first identified as a fibronectin-binding adhesin that promotes skin and joint colonization. BBK32 also binds to glycosaminoglycan (GAG), which, like fibronectin is ubiquitously present on cell surfaces. To determine which binding activity is relevant for BBK32-promoted infectivity, we generated a panel of BBK32 truncation and internal deletion mutants, and identified variants specifically defective for binding to either fibronectin or GAG. These variants promoted bacterial attachment to different mammalian cell types in vitro, suggesting that fibronectin and GAG binding may play distinct roles during infection. Intravenous inoculation of mice with a high-passage non-infectious B. burgdorferi strain that produced wild-type BBK32 or BBK32 mutants defective for GAG or fibronectin binding, revealed that only GAG-binding activity was required for significant localization to joints at 60 min post-infection. An otherwise infectious B. burgdorferi strain producing BBK32 specifically deficient in fibronectin binding was fully capable of both skin and joint colonization in the murine model, whereas a strain producing BBK32 selectively attenuated for GAG binding colonized the inoculation site but not knee or tibiotarsus joints. Thus, the BBK32 fibronectin- and GAG-binding activities are separable in vivo, and BBK32-mediated GAG binding, but not fibronectin binding, contributes to joint colonization. -##-Thus, the BBK32 fibronectin- and glycosaminoglycan-binding activities are separable in vivo, and BBK32-mediated glycosaminoglycan binding, but not fibronectin binding, contributes to joint colonization.
Borrelia burgdorferi, the etiologic agent of Lyme disease, adapts to the mammalian hosts by differentially expressing several genes in the BosR and Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS dependent pathways, resulting in a distinct protein profile relative to that seen for survival in the Ixodes spp. tick. Previous studies indicate that a putative lipoprotein, BBA33, is produced in an RpoS-dependent manner under conditions that mimic the mammalian component of the borrelial lifecycle. However, the significance and function for BBA33 is not known. Given its linkage to the BosR/Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS regulatory cascade, we hypothesized that BBA33 facilitates B. burgdorferi infection in the mammalian host. The deletion of bba33 eliminated B. burgdorferi infectivity in C3H mice, which was rescued by genetic complementation with intact bba33. With regard to function, a combinatorial peptide approach, coupled with subsequent in vitro binding assays, indicated that BBA33 binds to collagen type VI and, to a lesser extent, collagen type IV. Whole cell binding assays demonstrated BBA33-dependent binding to human collagen type VI. Taken together, these results suggest that BBA33 interacts with collagenous structures and may function as an adhesin in a process that is required to prevent bacterial clearance. -##-results suggest that BBA33 interacts with collagenous structures and may function as an adhesin in a process that is required to prevent bacterial clearance 
Decorin binding protein A (DBPA) is a glycosaminoglycan (GAG)-binding adhesin found on the surface of the bacterium Borrelia burgdorferi (B. burgdorferi), the causative agent of Lyme disease. DBPA facilitates bacterial adherence to extracellular matrices of human tissues and is crucial during the early stage of the infection process. Interestingly, DBPA from different strains (B31, N40, and PBr) show significant differences in GAG affinities, but the structural basis for the differences is not clear. In this study, we show that GAG affinity of N40 DBPA is modulated in part by flexible segments that control access to the GAG binding site, such that shortening of the linker leads to higher GAG affinity when analyzed using ELISA, gel mobility shift assay, solution NMR, and isothermal titration calorimetry. Our observation that GAG affinity differences among different B. burgdorferi strains can be attributed to a flexible linker domain regulating access to the GAG-binding domain is novel. It also provides a rare example of how neutral amino acids and dynamic segments in GAG binding proteins can have a large influence on GAG affinity and provides insights into why the number of basic amino acids in the GAG-binding site may not be the only factor determining GAG affinity of proteins. -##-insights into why the number of basic amino acids in the GAG-binding site of DBPA may not be the only factor determining GAG affinity of proteins (decorin binding protein A (DBPA)

Borrelia burgdorferi is the causative agent of Lyme disease. In B. burgdorferi, RpoS controls the expression of virulence genes needed for mammalian infection. The Fur homologue BosR regulates the transcription of rpoS and therefore BosR determines, albeit indirectly, the infection status of the spirochaete. Transcription of rpoS in B. burgdorferi is complex: rpoS can be transcribed either from an RpoD-dependent promoter to yield a long transcript or from an RpoN-dependent promoter to yield a short transcript. This study shows that BosR repressed synthesis of the long transcript while at the same time activating synthesis of the short transcript. How BosR does this is unclear. To address this, spirochaetes were engineered to express either BosR or the naturally occurring variant BosRR39K. Mice became infected by the spirochaetes expressing BosR but not by the spirochaetes expressing BosRR39K. Furthermore, the spirochaetes expressing BosR activated rpoS transcription during growth in culture whereas the spirochaetes expressing BosRR39K did not. Thus, BosR's activation of rpoS transcription somehow involves Arg39. This arginine is highly conserved in other FUR proteins and therefore other FUR proteins may also require this arginine to function. -##-Thus, activation of rpoS transcription by BosR somehow involves Arg39.
In Borrelia burgdorferi (Bb), the alternative sigma factor RpoS plays a central role during Bb's adaptation to ticks and mammals. Previous studies have demonstrated that RpoS is not expressed during the early stages of spirochetal growth or when Bb resides in ticks during the intermolt phase, but the molecular details of these events remain unknown. In the current study, biomagnetic bead separation of rpoS promoter-binding proteins, coupled with genetic inactivation, was employed to identify BadR (BB0693) as a negative regulator that controls growth phase-dependent induction of rpoS and bosR in Bb. When badR was inactivated, the expression of rpoS and bosR was induced only during the early stages of bacterial growth, but not during the stationary growth phase. Recombinant BadR bound to the promoter DNA of rpoS and the regulatory region upstream of bosR via AT-rich TAAAATAT motifs. Mutations in this motif markedly inhibited or abolished rBadR binding. These results suggest that BadR directly influences the expression of both rpoS and bosR in Bb. This newly recognized role for BadR to fine-tune the activation of the RpoN-RpoS pathway at strategic times in Bb's life cycle potentially represents another layer of gene control over σ(54)-dependent gene regulation.-##-BadR directly influences the expression of both rpoS and bosR in Borrelia burgdorferi 
HtrA serine proteases are highly conserved and essential ATP-independent proteases with chaperone activity. Bacteria express a variable number of HtrA homologues that contribute to the virulence and pathogenicity of bacterial pathogens. Lyme disease spirochetes possess a single HtrA protease homologue, Borrelia burgdorferi HtrA (BbHtrA). Previous studies established that, like the human orthologue HtrA1, BbHtrA is proteolytically active against numerous extracellular proteins in vitro. In this study, we utilized size exclusion chromatography and blue native polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis (BN-PAGE) to demonstrate BbHtrA oligomeric structures that were substrate independent and salt sensitive. Examination of the influence of transition metals on the activity of BbHtrA revealed that this protease is inhibited by Zn(2+) > Cu(2+) > Mn(2+). Extending this analysis to two other HtrA proteases, E. coli DegP and HtrA1, revealed that all three HtrA proteases were reversibly inhibited by ZnCl2 at all micro molar concentrations examined. Commercial inhibitors for HtrA proteases are not available and physiologic HtrA inhibitors are unknown. Our observation of conserved zinc inhibition of HtrA proteases will facilitate structural and functional studies of additional members of this important class of proteases.-##-HtrA proteases were reversibly inhibited by ZnCl2 at all micro molar concentrations. 
Pathogens that traffic in blood, lymphatics, or interstitial fluids must adopt strategies to evade innate immune defenses, notably the complement system. Through recruitment of host regulators of complement to their surface, many pathogens are able to escape complement-mediated attack. The Lyme disease spirochete, Borrelia burgdorferi, produces a number of surface proteins that bind to factor H related molecules, which function as the dominant negative regulator of the alternative pathway of complement. Relatively less is known about how B. burgdorferi evades the classical pathway of complement despite the observation that some sensu lato strains are sensitive to classical pathway activation. Here we report that the borrelial lipoprotein BBK32 potently and specifically inhibits the classical pathway by binding with high affinity to the initiating C1 complex of complement. In addition, B. burgdorferi cells that produce BBK32 on their surface bind to both C1 and C1r and a serum sensitive derivative of B. burgdorferi is protected from killing via the classical pathway in a BBK32-dependent manner. Subsequent biochemical and biophysical approaches localized the anti-complement activity of BBK32 to its globular C-terminal domain. Mechanistic studies reveal that BBK32 acts by entrapping C1 in its zymogen form by binding and inhibiting the C1 subcomponent, C1r, which serves as the initiating serine protease of the classical pathway. To our knowledge this is the first report of a spirochetal protein acting as a direct inhibitor of the classical pathway and is the only example of a biomolecule capable of specifically and noncovalently inhibiting C1/C1r. By identifying a unique mode of complement evasion this study greatly enhances our understanding of how pathogens subvert and potentially manipulate host innate immune systems. -##-we show that the causative agent of Lyme disease, Borrelia burgdorferi, expresses a surface-protein termed BBK32 that targets and inhibits the first component of complement, designated C1

UNLABELLED: It is well established that the RpoN-RpoS sigma factor (σ(54)-σ(S)) cascade plays an essential role in differential gene expression during the enzootic cycle of Borrelia burgdorferi, the causative agent of Lyme disease. The RpoN-RpoS pathway is activated by the response regulator/σ(54)-dependent activator (also called bacterial enhancer-binding protein [bEBP]) Rrp2. One unique feature of Rrp2 is that this activator is essential for cell replication, whereas RpoN-RpoS is dispensable for bacterial growth. How Rrp2 controls cell replication, a function that is independent of RpoN-RpoS, remains to be elucidated. In this study, by generating a series of conditional rrp2 mutant strains, we demonstrated that the N-terminal receiver domain of Rrp2 is required for spirochetal growth. Furthermore, a D52A point mutation at the phosphorylation site within the N terminus of Rrp2 abolished cell replication. Mutation of the ATPase motif within the central domain of Rrp2 did not affect spirochetal replication, indicating that phosphorylation-dependent ATPase activity of Rrp2 for σ(54) activation is not required for cell growth. However, deletion of the C-terminal domain or a 16-amino-acid truncation of the helix-turn-helix (HTH) DNA-binding motif within the C-terminal domain of Rrp2 abolished spirochetal replication. It was shown that constitutive expression of rpoS is deleterious to borrelial growth. We showed that the essential nature of Rrp2 is not due to an effect on rpoS These data suggest that phosphorylation-dependent oligomerization and DNA binding of Rrp2 likely function as a repressor, independently of the activation of σ(54), controlling an essential step of cell replication in B. burgdorferi IMPORTANCE: Bacterial enhancer-binding proteins (bEBPs) are a unique group of transcriptional activators specifically required for σ(54)-dependent gene transcription. This work demonstrates that the B. burgdorferi bEBP, Rrp2, has an additional function that is independent of σ(54), that of its essentiality for spirochetal growth, and such a function is dependent on its N-terminal signal domain and C-terminal DNA-binding domain. These findings expand our knowledge on bEBP and provide a foundation to further study the underlying mechanism of this new function of bEBP.-##-Study demonstrates that phosphorylation of the receiver domain is essential for both functions of Rrp2, the function as a bEBP to activate sigma 54-dependent gene transcription and the function required for cell growth. 
Borrelia burgdorferi possesses a sophisticated and complex chemotaxis system, but how the organism utilizes this system in its natural enzootic life cycle is poorly understood. Of the three CheY chemotaxis response regulators in B. burgdorferi, we found that only deletion of cheY3 resulted in an altered motility and significantly reduced chemotaxis phenotype. Although ΔcheY3 maintained normal densities in unfed ticks, their numbers were significantly reduced in fed ticks compared with the parental or cheY3-complemented spirochetes. Importantly, mice fed upon by the ΔcheY3-infected ticks did not develop a persistent infection. Intravital confocal microscopy analyses discovered that the ΔcheY3 spirochetes were motile within skin, but appeared unable to reverse direction and perform the characteristic backward-forward motility displayed by the parental strain. Subsequently, the ΔcheY3 became 'trapped' in the skin matrix within days of inoculation, were cleared from the skin needle-inoculation site within 96 h post-injection and did not disseminate to distant tissues. Interestingly, although ΔcheY3 cells were cleared within 96 h post-injection, this attenuated infection elicited significant levels of B. burgdorferi-specific IgM and IgG. Taken together, these data demonstrate that cheY3-mediated chemotaxis is crucial for motility, dissemination and viability of the spirochete both within and between mice and ticks.-##-The Borrelia burgdorferi CheY3 response regulator is essential for chemotaxis and completion of its natural infection cycle.
Borrelia burgdorferi (Bb) is the causative agent of Lyme disease in the United States, a disease that can result in carditis, and chronic and debilitating arthritis and/or neurologic symptoms if left untreated. Bb survives in the midgut of the Ixodes scapularis tick, or within tissues of immunocompetent hosts. In the early stages of infection, the bacteria are present in the bloodstream where they must resist clearance by the innate immune system of the host. We have found a novel role for outer surface protein C (OspC) from B. burgdorferi and B. garinii in interactions with the complement component C4b and bloodstream survival in vivo. Our data show that OspC inhibits the classical and lectin complement pathways and competes with complement protein C2 for C4b binding. Resistance to complement is important for maintenance of the lifecycle of Bb, enabling survival of the pathogen within the host as well as in the midgut of a feeding tick when ospC expression is induced.-##-These data show that Borrelia burgdorferi OspC inhibits the classical and lectin complement pathways and competes with complement protein C2 for C4b binding.
Although many naturally occurring proteins consist of multiple domains, most studies on protein folding to date deal with single-domain proteins or isolated domains of multi-domain proteins. Studies of multi-domain protein folding are required for further advancing our understanding of protein folding mechanisms. Borrelia outer surface protein A (OspA) is a β-rich two-domain protein, in which two globular domains are connected by a rigid and stable single-layer β-sheet. Thus, OspA is particularly suited as a model system for studying the interplays of domains in protein folding. Here, we studied the equilibria and kinetics of the urea-induced folding-unfolding reactions of OspA probed with tryptophan fluorescence and ultraviolet circular dichroism. Global analysis of the experimental data revealed compelling lines of evidence for accumulation of an on-pathway intermediate during kinetic refolding and for the identity between the kinetic intermediate and a previously described equilibrium unfolding intermediate. The results suggest that the intermediate has the fully native structure in the N-terminal domain and the single layer β-sheet, with the C-terminal domain still unfolded. The observation of the productive on-pathway folding intermediate clearly indicates substantial interactions between the two domains mediated by the single-layer β-sheet. We propose that a rigid and stable intervening region between two domains creates an overlap between two folding units and can energetically couple their folding reactions.-##-Data found that OspA folded through a productive on-pathway folding intermediate, in which the N-terminal domain of the protein was folded into the native structure with the C-terminal domain still unfolded. An overlapping region was shown between the N-terminal and the C-terminal folding units and that this overlapping region plays a critical role in determining the folding behavior of OspA. 
Borrelia burgdorferi sensu lato, the agent of Lyme disease, exists in nature through a complex enzootic life cycle that involves both ticks and mammals. The B. burgdorferi genome encodes five Oligopeptide ABC transporters (Opp) that are predicted to be involve in transport of various nutrients. Previously, it was reported that OppA5 is important for the optimal production of OspC, a major virulence factor of B. burgdorferi. In this study, possible role of another Oligopeptide ABC transporter, OppA4 in ospC expression was investigated by construction of an oppA4 deletion mutant and the complemented strain. Inactivation of oppA4 resulted an increased production of OspC, suggesting that OppA4 has a negative impact on ospC expression. Expression of ospC is controlled by Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS, the central pathway essential for mammal infection. We showed that increased ospC expression in the oppA4 mutant was due to an increased rpoS expression. We then further investigated how OppA4 negatively regulates this pathway. Two regulators, BosR and BadR, are known to positively and negatively, respectively, regulate the Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS pathway. We found that deletion of oppA4 resulted in an increased level of BosR. Previous reports showed that bosR is mainly regulated at the post-transcriptional level by other factors. However, OppA4 appears to negatively regulate bosR expression at the transcriptional level. The finding of OppA4 involved in regulation of the Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS pathway further reinforces the importance of nutritional virulence to the enzootic cycle of B. burgdorferi.-##-The finding of OppA4 involved in regulation of the Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS pathway further reinforces the importance of nutritional virulence to the enzootic cycle of B. burgdorferi 
Borrelia burgdorferi alternates between ticks and mammals, requiring variable gene expression and protein production to adapt to these diverse niches. These adaptations include shifting among the major outer surface lipoproteins OspA, OspC, and VlsE at different stages of the infectious cycle. We hypothesize that these proteins carry out a basic but essential function, and that OspC and VlsE fulfil this requirement during early and persistent stages of mammalian infection respectively. Previous work by other investigators suggested that several B. burgdorferi lipoproteins, including OspA and VlsE, could substitute for OspC at the initial stage of mouse infection, when OspC is transiently but absolutely required. In this study, we assessed whether vlsE and ospA could restore infectivity to an ospC mutant, and found that neither gene product effectively compensated for the absence of OspC during early infection. In contrast, we determined that OspC production was required by B. burgdorferi throughout SCID mouse infection if the vlsE gene were absent. Together, these results indicate that OspC can substitute for VlsE when antigenic variation is unnecessary, but that these two abundant lipoproteins are optimized for their related but specific roles during early and persistent mammalian infection by B. burgdorferi.-##-These results indicate that OspC can substitute for VlsE when antigenic variation is unnecessary, but that these two abundant lipoproteins are optimized for their related but specific roles during early and persistent mammalian infection.

In endemic regions, Lyme disease is a potential health threat to dogs. Canine Lyme disease manifests with arthritis-induced lameness, anorexia, fever, lethargy, lymphadenopathy and, in some cases, fatal glomerulonephritis. A recent study revealed that the regional mean for the percentage of seropositive dogs in the north-east of the USA is 11.6%. The outer surface protein C (OspC) of Lyme disease spirochetes is an important virulence factor required for the establishment of infection in mammals. It is a leading candidate in human and canine Lyme disease vaccine development efforts. Over 30 distinct ospC phyletic types have been defined. It has been hypothesized that ospC genotype may influence mammalian host range. In this study, Ixodes scapularis ticks collected from the field in Rhode Island were assessed for infection with B. burgdorferi. Ticks were fed on purpose bred beagles to repletion and infection of the dogs was assessed through serology and PCR. Tissue biopsies (n=2) were collected from each dog 49 days post-tick infestation (dpi) and the ospC genotype of the infecting strains determined by direct PCR of DNA extracted from tissue or by PCR after cultivation of spirochetes from biopsy samples. The dominant ospC types associated with B. burgdorferi canine infections differed from those associated with human infection, indicating a relationship between ospC sequence and preferred host range. Knowledge of the most common ospC genotypes associated specifically with infection of dogs will facilitate the rational design of OspC-based canine Lyme disease vaccines and diagnostic assays.-##-The dominant ospC types associated with B. burgdorferi canine infections differed from those associated with human infection, indicating a relationship between ospC sequence and preferred host range.

Detection of intrathecally produced specific antibodies (AI) is essential in the diagnosis of Lyme neuroborreliosis (LNB); however, the performance of various newer AI detection methods has not been systematically assessed. Here we assessed and compared advanced test systems for detecting borrelia IgG-AI and IgM-AI. Serum and cerebrospinal fluid (CSF) samples from well-defined LNB and tick-borne encephalitis (TBE) patients, 25 each, were tested with three antibody detection systems, one based on chemiluminescence (CLA) and two based on enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA), employing different antigens for detection of IgG and IgM antibodies. In samples from patients with LNB, IgG-AI was detected in 20 samples by CLA, 19 by ELISA1, and 22 by ELISA2, and IgM-AI was detected in 16 samples by CLA, six by ELISA1, and 11 by ELISA2. In samples from TBE patients, IgG-AI was positive in one case by CLA and ELISA2, and in 7 cases by ELISA1, whereas IgM-AI was positive in one case by CLA and in none by ELISA. IgG-AI and IgM-AI were not detected within the first week of disease. Duration of disease correlated with IgG-AI while IgM-AI results were heterogeneous for each test assay. Moreover, the levels of IgG-AI, but not IgM-AI, correlated with protein concentration in CSF. IgG is the relevant immunoglobulin isotype for detecting intrathecal synthesis of borrelia antibodies. The highest sensitivity and specificity were achieved by the antibody detection assay using VlsE IR6 peptide. Detection of IgM-AI yielded heterogenous results and did not support the laboratory diagnosis of LNB. -##-Intrathecally produced IgG and IgM antibodies to recombinant VlsE, VlsE peptide, recombinant OspC and whole cell extracts in the diagnosis of Lyme neuroborreliosis.

Outer surface protein C (OspC) is one of the major lipoproteins expressed on the surface of Borrelia burgdorferi during tick feeding and the early phase of mammalian infection. OspC is required for B. burgdorferi to establish infection in both immunocompetent and SCID mice and has been proposed to facilitate evasion of innate immune defenses. However, the exact biological function of OspC remains elusive. In this study, we showed that the ospC-deficient spirochete could not establish infection in NOD-scid IL2rγ(null) mice that lack B cells, T cells, NK cells, and lytic complement. The ospC mutant also could not establish infection in anti-Ly6G-treated SCID and C3H/HeN mice (depletion of neutrophils). However, depletion of mononuclear phagocytes at the skin site of inoculation in SCID and C3H/HeN mice allowed the ospC mutant to establish infection in vivo. In phagocyte-depleted mice, the ospC mutant was able to colonize the joints and triggered neutrophilia during dissemination. Furthermore, we found that phagocytosis of green fluorescent protein (GFP)-expressing ospC mutant spirochetes by murine peritoneal macrophages and human THP-1 macrophage-like cells, but not in PMN-HL60, was significantly higher than parental wild-type B. burgdorferi strains, suggesting that OspC has an antiphagocytic property. In addition, overproduction of OspC in spirochetes also decreased the uptake of spirochetes by murine peritoneal macrophages. Together, our findings provide evidence that mononuclear phagocytes play a key role in clearance of the ospC mutant and that OspC promotes spirochetes' evasion of macrophages during early Lyme borreliosis. -##-OspC is an antiphagocytic factor that protects Borrelia burgdorferi from phagocytosis by macrophages.

Borrelia burgdorferi, a Lyme disease agent, makes different major outer surface lipoproteins at different stages of its mouse-tick infectious cycle. Outer surface protein A (OspA) coats the spirochetes from the time they enter ticks until they are transmitted to a mammal. OspA is required for normal tick colonization and has been shown to bind a tick midgut protein, indicating that OspA may serve as a tick midgut adhesin. Tick colonization by spirochetes lacking OspA is increased when the infecting blood meal is derived from mice that do not produce antibody, indicating that OspA may protect the spirochetes from host antibody, which will not recognize tick-specific proteins such as OspA. To further study the importance of OspA during tick colonization, we constructed a form of B. burgdorferi in which the ospA open reading frame, on lp54, was replaced with the ospC gene or the ospB gene, encoding a mammal-specific or tick-specific lipoprotein, respectively. These fusions yielded a strain that produces OspC within a tick (from the fusion gene) and during early mammalian infection (from the normal ospC locus) and a strain that produces OspB in place of OspA within ticks. Here we show that the related, tick-specific protein OspB can fully substitute for OspA, whereas the unrelated, mammal-specific protein OspC cannot. These data were derived from three different methods of infecting ticks, and they confirm and extend previous studies indicating that OspA both protects spirochetes within ticks from mammalian antibody and serves an additional role during tick colonization.-##-Here the authors show that the related, tick-specific protein OspB can fully substitute for OspA, whereas the unrelated, mammal-specific protein OspC cannot.

In current work, we used recombinant OspC protein derived from B. afzelii strain BRZ31 in the native homodimeric fold for mice immunization and following selection process to produce three mouse monoclonal antibodies able to bind to variable parts of up to five different OspC proteins. Applying the combination of mass spectrometry assisted epitope mapping and affinity based theoretical prediction we have localized regions responsible for antigen-antibody interactions and approximate epitopes' amino acid composition. Two mAbs (3F4 and 2A9) binds to linear epitopes located in previously described immunogenic regions in the exposed part of OspC protein. The third mAb (2D1) recognises highly conserved discontinuous epitope close to the ligand binding domain 1.-##-Epitope mapping of Borrelia burgdorferi OspC protein in homodimeric fold.

Borrelia burgdorferi sensu lato, the agent of Lyme disease, exists in nature through a complex enzootic life cycle that involves both ticks and mammals. The B. burgdorferi genome encodes five Oligopeptide ABC transporters (Opp) that are predicted to be involve in transport of various nutrients. Previously, it was reported that OppA5 is important for the optimal production of OspC, a major virulence factor of B. burgdorferi. In this study, possible role of another Oligopeptide ABC transporter, OppA4 in ospC expression was investigated by construction of an oppA4 deletion mutant and the complemented strain. Inactivation of oppA4 resulted an increased production of OspC, suggesting that OppA4 has a negative impact on ospC expression. Expression of ospC is controlled by Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS, the central pathway essential for mammal infection. We showed that increased ospC expression in the oppA4 mutant was due to an increased rpoS expression. We then further investigated how OppA4 negatively regulates this pathway. Two regulators, BosR and BadR, are known to positively and negatively, respectively, regulate the Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS pathway. We found that deletion of oppA4 resulted in an increased level of BosR. Previous reports showed that bosR is mainly regulated at the post-transcriptional level by other factors. However, OppA4 appears to negatively regulate bosR expression at the transcriptional level. The finding of OppA4 involved in regulation of the Rrp2-RpoN-RpoS pathway further reinforces the importance of nutritional virulence to the enzootic cycle of B. burgdorferi.-##-We showed that increased ospC expression in the oppA4 mutant was due to an increased rpoS expression.

The primary causative agent of tick-borne relapsing fever in North America is Borrelia hermsii. It has been hypothesized that B. hermsii evades complement-mediated destruction by binding factor H (FH), a host-derived negative regulator of complement. In vitro, B. hermsii produces a single FH binding protein designated FhbA (FH binding protein A). The properties and ligand binding activity of FhbA suggest that it plays multiple roles in pathogenesis. It binds plasminogen and has been identified as a significant target of a B1b B cell-mediated IgM response in mice. FhbA has also been explored as a potential diagnostic antigen for B. hermsii infection in humans. The ability to test the hypothesis that FhbA is a critical virulence factor in vivo has been hampered by the lack of well-developed systems for the genetic manipulation of the relapsing fever spirochetes. In this report, we have successfully generated a B. hermsii fhbA deletion mutant (the B. hermsii YORΔfhbA strain) through allelic exchange mutagenesis. Deletion of fhbA abolished FH binding by the YORΔfhbA strain and eliminated cleavage of C3b on the cell surface. However, the YORΔfhbA strain remained infectious in mice and retained resistance to killing in vitro by human complement. Collectively, these results indicate that B. hermsii employs an FhbA/FH-independent mechanism of complement evasion that allows for resistance to killing by human complement and persistence in mice. -##-Deletion of fhbA abolished complement factor H binding and eliminated cleavage of C3b on the cell surface, however, the YORDeltafhbA strain remained infectious in mice and retained resistance to killing in vitro by human complement.

Cyclic nucleotide-sensitive ion channels are molecular pores that open in response to cAMP or cGMP, which are universal second messengers. Binding of a cyclic nucleotide to the carboxyterminal cyclic nucleotide binding domain (CNBD) of these channels is thought to cause a conformational change that promotes channel opening. The C-linker domain, which connects the channel pore to this CNBD, plays an important role in coupling ligand binding to channel opening. Current structural insight into this mechanism mainly derives from X-ray crystal structures of the C-linker/CNBD from hyperpolarization-activated cyclic nucleotide-modulated (HCN) channels. However, these structures reveal little to no conformational changes upon comparison of the ligand-bound and unbound form. In this study, we take advantage of a recently identified prokaryote ion channel, SthK, which has functional properties that strongly resemble cyclic nucleotide-gated (CNG) channels and is activated by cAMP, but not by cGMP. We determined X-ray crystal structures of the C-linker/CNBD of SthK in the presence of cAMP or cGMP. We observe that the structure in complex with cGMP, which is an antagonist, is similar to previously determined HCN channel structures. In contrast, the structure in complex with cAMP, which is an agonist, is in a more open conformation. We observe that the CNBD makes an outward swinging movement, which is accompanied by an opening of the C-linker. This conformation mirrors the open gate structures of the Kv1.2 channel or MthK channel, which suggests that the cAMP-bound C-linker/CNBD from SthK represents an activated conformation. These results provide a structural framework for better understanding cyclic nucleotide modulation of ion channels, including HCN and CNG channels. -##-Ion channel gating mechanism of a bacterial, cyclic AMP activated, potassium channel. 
Spirochaeta thermophila secretes seven glycoside hydrolases for plant biomass degradation that carry a carbohydrate-binding module 64 (CBM64) appended at the C-terminus. CBM64 adsorbs to various β1-4-linked pyranose substrates and shows high affinity for cellulose. We present the first crystal structure of a CBM64 at 1.2 Å resolution, which reveals a jelly-roll-like fold corresponding to a surface-binding type A CBM. Modeling of its interaction with cellulose indicates that CBM64 achieves association with the hydrophobic face of β-linked pyranose chains via a unique coplanar arrangement of four exposed tryptophan side chains. Proteins 2016; 84:855-858. © 2016 Wiley Periodicals, Inc.-##-Spirochaeta thermophila secretes seven glycoside hydrolases for plant biomass degradation that carry a carbohydrate-binding module 64 (CBM64) appended at the C-terminus. Presented is the first crystal structure of a CBM64 at 1.2 A resolution. 
Deconstruction of cellulose, the most abundant plant cell wall polysaccharide, requires the cooperative activity of a large repertoire of microbial enzymes. Modular cellulases contain non-catalytic type A carbohydrate-binding modules (CBMs) that specifically bind to the crystalline regions of cellulose, thus promoting enzyme efficacy through proximity and targeting effects. Although type A CBMs play a critical role in cellulose recycling, their mechanism of action remains poorly understood. Here we produced a library of recombinant CBMs representative of the known diversity of type A modules. The binding properties of 40 CBMs, in fusion with an N-terminal GFP domain, revealed that type A CBMs possess the ability to recognize different crystalline forms of cellulose and chitin over a wide range of temperatures, pH levels, and ionic strengths. A -##-The structure of S. thermophila StCBM64C revealed an untwisted, flat, carbohydrate-binding interface comprising the side chains of four tryptophan residues in a co-planar linear arrangement. Significantly, two highly conserved asparagine side chains, each one located between two tryptophan residues, are critical to insoluble and soluble glucan recognition but not to bind xyloglucan. 
Cyclic nucleotide-modulated channels have important roles in visual signal transduction and pacemaking. Binding of cyclic nucleotides (cAMP/cGMP) elicits diverse functional responses in different channels within the family despite their high sequence and structure homology. The molecular mechanisms responsible for ligand discrimination and gating are unknown due to lack of correspondence between structural information and functional states. Using single particle cryo-electron microscopy and single-channel recording, we assigned functional states to high-resolution structures of SthK, a prokaryotic cyclic nucleotide-gated channel. The structures for apo, cAMP-bound, and cGMP-bound SthK in lipid nanodiscs, correspond to no, moderate, and low single-channel activity, respectively, consistent with the observation that all structures are in resting, closed states. The similarity between apo and ligand-bound structures indicates that ligand-binding domains are strongly coupled to pore and SthK gates in an allosteric, concerted fashion. The different orientations of cAMP and cGMP in the 'resting' and 'activated' structures suggest a mechanism for ligand discrimination.-##-The similarity between apo and ligand-bound structures indicates that ligand-binding domains are strongly coupled to pore and SthK gates in an allosteric, concerted fashion. The different orientations of cAMP and cGMP in the 'resting' and 'activated' structures suggest a mechanism for ligand discrimination.
A novel gene was identified in the Treponema denticola prcA-prtP protease operon. Strains with mutations in either the prcA-prtP or the msp region showed altered expression of a product(s) of the other locus. Together, these results provide information on the assembly of outer membrane complexes involved in T. denticola interaction with host cells and tissue.-##-Strains with mutations in either the prcA-prtP or the msp region showed altered expression of the other locus.  (msp = major outer sheath protein)

The gene encoding the Treponema denticola factor H-like protein 1 (FHL-1) binding protein, FhbB, was recovered and characterized. Sequence conservation, expression, and properties of FhbB were analyzed. The identification of FhbB represents an important step in understanding the contribution of FHL-1 binding in T. denticola pathogenesis and in development of periodontal disease.-##-The gene encoding the Treponema denticola factor H-like protein 1 (FHL-1) binding protein, FhbB, was recovered and characterized 
Treponema denticola major outer sheath protein (Msp) inhibits neutrophil chemotaxis in vitro, but key regulatory mechanisms have not been identified. Because the Rac small GTPases regulate directional migration in response to chemoattractants, the objective was to analyse the effects of Msp on formyl-methionyl-leucyl-phenylalanine (fMLP)-mediated neutrophil polarization and Rac activation in murine neutrophils. Msp pretreatment of neutrophils inhibited both polarization and chemotactic migration in response to fMLP. Activation of small GTPases was measured by p21 binding domain (PBD) pulldown assays, followed by Western analysis, using monoclonal anti-Rac1, anti-Rac2, anti-cdc42 and anti-RhoA antibodies. Enriched native Msp selectively inhibited fMLP-stimulated Rac1 activation in a concentration-dependent manner, but did not affect Rac2, cdc42 or RhoA activation. Murine neutrophils transfected with vectors expressing fluorescent probes PAK-PBD-YFP and PH-AKT-RFP were used to determine the effects of Msp on the localization of activated Rac and PI3 kinase products. Real-time confocal images showed that Msp inhibited the polarized accumulation of activated Rac and PI3-kinase products upon exposure to fMLP. The findings indicate that T. denticola Msp inhibition of neutrophil polarity may be due to the selective suppression of the Rac1 pathway.-##-Msp inhibits the polarized accumulation of activated Rac and PI3-kinase products upon exposure to formyl-methionyl-leucyl-phenylalanine (fMLP).  
Coagreggation of Treponema denticola with either Porphyromonas gingivalis or Fusobacterium nucleatum was characterized and the role of the major outer sheath protein (MSP) in the coaggregation process of these bacteria was evaluated. The MSP of T. denticola was found to be able to bind to P. gingivalis and F. nucleatum cells and this binding could be inhibited by MSP in a concentration-dependent manner. While sodium dodecyl sulfate polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis and Periodic acid-Schiff (PAS) staining of MSP revealed that it is a glycoprotein, monosaccharide analysis showed that MSP contains: Glc (44.4), Gal (20.4%) GlcN (1.3%), GalN (31.6%) and Fuc (9.2%). Peptide N-glycosidase F deglycosylation of MSP was found to inhibit its binding to F. nucleatum but not to P. gingivalis cells. Sugar-binding studies showed that the requirements for the binding of both T. denticola and MSP to F. nucleatum cells are similar to those of the F. nucleatum galactose-binding lectin. These data suggest that MSP acts as an adhesin during the coaggregation process of T. denticola with P. gingivalis and F. nucleatum through its protein and carbohydrate moieties, respectively.-##-These data suggest that major outer sheath protein (MSP) acts as an adhesin during the coaggregation process of T. denticola with P. gingivalis and F. nucleatum through its protein and carbohydrate moieties, respectively. 
Treponema denticola, a spirochete associated with periodontitis, is abundant at the leading edge of subgingival plaque, where it interacts with gingival epithelia. T. denticola produces a number of virulence factors, including dentilisin, a protease which is cytopathic to host cells, and FhbB, a unique T. denticola lipoprotein that binds complement regulatory proteins. Earlier analyses suggested that FhbB specifically bound to factor H (FH)-like protein 1 (FHL-1). However, by using dentilisin-deficient mutants of T. denticola, we found that T. denticola preferentially binds FH and not FHL-1, and that FH is then cleaved by dentilisin to yield an FH subfragment of approximately 50 kDa. FH bound to dentilisin-deficient mutants but was not cleaved and retained its ability to serve as a cofactor for factor I in the cleavage of C3b. To assess the molecular basis of the interaction of FhbB with FH, mutational analyses were conducted. Replacement of specific residues in widely separated domains of FhbB and disruption of a central alpha helix with coiled-coil formation probability attenuated or eliminated FH binding. The data presented here are the first to demonstrate the retention at the cell surface of a proteolytic cleavage product of FH. The precise role of this FH fragment in the host-pathogen interaction remains to be determined.-##-In this study we demonstrated with a pull-down assay that purified full-length recombinant lipoprotein FhbB (lacking the leader peptide) binds exclusively to FH and not to FHL-1(factor H-like protein 1). 
Treponema denticola levels in the gingival crevice become elevated as periodontal disease develops. Oral treponemes may account for as much as 40% of the total bacterial population in the periodontal pocket. The stimuli that trigger enhanced growth of T. denticola, and the mechanisms associated with the transmission of these signals, remain to be defined. We hypothesize that the T. denticola open reading frames tde1970 (histidine kinase) and tde1969 (response regulator) constitute a functional two-component regulatory system that regulates, at least in part, responses to the changing environmental conditions associated with the development of periodontal disease. The results presented demonstrate that tde1970 and tde1969 are conserved, universal among T. denticola isolates and transcribed as part of a seven-gene operon in a growth-phase-dependent manner. tde1970 undergoes autophosphorylation and transfers phosphate to tde1969. Henceforth, the proteins encoded by these open reading frames are designated as Hpk2 and Rrp2 respectively. Hpk2 autophosphorylation kinetics were influenced by environmental conditions and by the presence or absence of a PAS domain. It can be concluded that Hpk2 and Rrp2 constitute a functional two-component system that contributes to environmental sensing.-##-Hpk2 and Rrp2 constitute a functional two-component system that contributes to environmental sensing 
Treponema denticola is a major pathogen of chronic periodontitis. Analysis of the T. denticola genome revealed a gene orthologous with a cysteine protease-encoding gene from Streptococcus pyogenes (IdeS). IdeS interferes with IgG-dependent opsonophagocytosis by specific cleavage of IgG molecules. Analysis of this gene (termed ideT) revealed it to encode a two-domain protein whose N-terminus is composed of tandem immunoglobulin-like domains followed by a C-terminal IdeS-like protease domain. In this study we show that during secretion the IdeT protein is processed into an N-terminal fragment which remains associated with the cell, and a C-terminal part released into the medium. Although the secreted domain of IdeT, termed dentipain, shows only 25% identity to the IdeS protease, the putative catalytic cysteine and histidine residues are strongly conserved. Recombinant dentipain cleaves the insulin β-chain, an activity which is inhibited by E-64, a diagnostic inhibitor of cysteine proteases. Apart from insulin no cleavage of other protein substrates was detected, suggesting that dentipain has oligopeptidase activity. A mutant strain was constructed expressing a modified IdeT variant, the dentipain domain of which was deleted. This strain was found to be significantly reduced in its abscess-forming activity compared with the parental strain in a murine abscess model, suggesting that dentipain contributes to the virulence of T. denticola.-##-dentipain contributes to the virulence of T. denticola 
Treponema denticola is a primary etiological agent of periodontal disease. T. denticola evades complement-mediated killing by binding to the host's factor H (FH), a negative regulator of the alternative complement pathway. The T. denticola FH-binding protein has been identified and designated as factor H-binding protein B (FhbB). Crystals of recombinant FhbB were obtained by the hanging-drop vapor-diffusion method using sodium citrate and 0.2 M sodium thiocyanate. FhbB crystals diffracted to 1.8 Å resolution and belonged to space group P4(3)2(1)2 or P4(1)2(1)2, with unit-cell parameters a = b = 46.76, c = 167.68 Å. Two FhbB molecules per asymmetric unit gave a Matthews coefficient of 2.2 Å(3) Da(-1) and a solvent content of 44%. FhbB is the smallest bacterially produced FH-binding protein identified to date. Determination of its structure will provide unique insight into the minimal structural determinants required for FH binding.-##-FhbB crystals diffracted to 1.8 A resolution and belonged to space group P4(3)2(1)2 or P4(1)2(1)2, with unit-cell parameters a = b = 46.76, c = 167.68 A
Host defense peptides are innate immune effectors that possess both bactericidal activities and immunomodulatory functions. Deficiency in the human host defense peptide LL-37 has previously been correlated with severe periodontal disease. Treponema denticola is an oral anaerobic spirochete closely associated with the pathogenesis of periodontal disease. The T. denticola major surface protein (MSP), involved in adhesion and cytotoxicity, and the dentilisin serine protease are key virulence factors of this organism. In this study, we examined the interactions between LL-37 and T. denticola. The three T. denticola strains tested were susceptible to LL-37. Dentilisin was found to inactivate LL-37 by cleaving it at the Lys, Phe, Gln, and Val residues. However, dentilisin deletion did not increase the susceptibility of T. denticola to LL-37. Furthermore, dentilisin activity was found to be inhibited by human saliva. In contrast, a deficiency of the T. denticola MSP increased resistance to LL-37. The MSP-deficient mutant bound less fluorescently labeled LL-37 than the wild-type strain. MSP demonstrated specific, dose-dependent LL-37 binding. In conclusion, though capable of LL-37 inactivation, dentilisin does not protect T. denticola from LL-37. Rather, the rapid, MSP-mediated binding of LL-37 to the treponemal outer sheath precedes cleavage by dentilisin. Moreover, in vivo, saliva inhibits dentilisin, thus preventing LL-37 restriction and ensuring its bactericidal and immunoregulatory activities.-##-In contrast, a deficiency of the Treponema denticola major outer sheath protein increased resistance to LL-37.
Periodontitis is the most common disease of microbial etiology in humans. Periopathogen survival is dependent upon evasion of complement-mediated destruction. Treponema denticola, an important contributor to periodontitis, evades killing by the alternative complement cascade by binding factor H (FH) to its surface. Bound FH is rapidly cleaved by the T. denticola protease, dentilisin. In this report, the structure of the T. denticola FH-binding protein, FhbB, was solved to 1.7 Å resolution. FhbB possesses a unique fold that imparts high thermostability. The kinetics of the FH/FhbB interaction were assessed using surface plasmon resonance. A K(D) value in the micromolar range (low affinity) was demonstrated, and rapid off kinetics were observed. Site-directed mutagenesis and sucrose octasulfate competition assays collectively indicate that the negatively charged face of FhbB binds within FH complement control protein module 7. This study provides significant new insight into the molecular basis of FH/FhbB interaction and advances our understanding of the role that T. denticola plays in the development and progression of periodontal disease.-##-structure of the FH-binding protein, FhbB, was solved to 1.7 A resolution; study provides significant new insight into the molecular basis of FH/FhbB interaction and advances our understanding of the role that T. denticola plays in the development and progression of periodontal disease.
Treponema denticola is a proteolytic-anaerobic spirochete whose abundance in the subgingival crevice correlates with periodontal disease severity. Treponema denticola evades serum-mediated killing through the binding of factor H (FH), a negative regulator of the complement system. The T. denticolaFH receptor has been identified as FhbB, an 11.4kDa immunodominant lipoprotein. Three distinct subfamilies of FhbB proteins have been delineated and designated as FhbB1, FhbB2 and FhbB3. In this study we demonstrate that all FhbB variants bind human plasminogen (Plg). Competitive binding analyses revealed that FH and Plg do not compete for binding. Binding studies with FhbB1-##-FhbB is a multi-functional protein that may contribute to virulence through several mechanisms including immune evasion, manipulation of the host immune response, adherence or tissue invasion.
Autoantibodies against alpha-enolase (ENO1) are often detected in various infectious and autoimmune diseases. Anti-ENO1 antibody titers were reported to be associated with the severity of periodontitis in patients with rheumatoid arthritis. Because the enolase of the periodontal pathogen Treponema denticola (TdEno) has the highest homology with ENO1 among the enolases of human-associated bacteria, we hypothesized that anti-ENO1 autoantibodies produced during the immune response to TdEno may contribute to the progression of periodontitis and tested it in human and mouse systems. In human subjects with healthy periodontium or chronic periodontitis, a strong positive correlation between the levels of anti-TdEno and anti-ENO1 antibodies was observed. In addition, the purified anti-TdEno antibodies recognized ENO1 as well as TdEno in a dot blot, confirming the cross-reactivity between TdEno and ENO1. However, anti-ENO1 antibody titers were not associated with the severity of periodontitis. To further investigate the role of TdEno in the production of anti-ENO1 antibodies and the progression of periodontitis, mice received an oral gavage of P. gingivalis alone, subcutaneous immunization with TdEno alone, or both P. gingivalis oral gavage and TdEno immunization. Immunization with TdEno induced not only anti-TdEno but also anti-mouse Eno1 (mEno1) antibodies and increased the expression of TNFα in the gingival tissues. However, alveolar bone loss was not increased by TdEno immunization. In conclusion, autoreactive anti-ENO1/mEno1 antibodies that are produced as byproducts during the antibody response to TdEno play a minimal role in the progression of periodontitis in the absence of rheumatoid arthritis.-##-autoreactive anti-ENO1 (alpha-enolase)/mEno1 antibodies that are produced as byproducts during the antibody response to TdEno play a minimal role in the progression of periodontitis in the absence of rheumatoid arthritis 
The sexually transmitted disease syphilis is caused by the bacterial spirochete Treponema pallidum. This microorganism is genetically intractable, accounting for the large number of putative and undercharacterized members of the pathogen's proteome. In an effort to ascribe a function(s) to the TP0435 (Tp17) lipoprotein, we engineered a soluble variant of the protein (rTP0435) and determined its crystal structure at a resolution of 2.42 Å. The structure is characterized by an eight-stranded β-barrel protein with a shallow "basin" at one end of the barrel and an α-helix stacked on the opposite end. Furthermore, there is a disulfide-linked dimer of the protein in the asymmetric unit of the crystals. Solution hydrodynamic experiments established that purified rTP0435 is monomeric, but specifically forms the disulfide-stabilized dimer observed in the crystal structure. The data herein, when considered with previous work on TP0435, imply plausible roles for the protein in either ligand binding, treponemal membrane architecture, and/or pathogenesis. -##-The structure of the TP0435 (Tp17) lipoprotein is characterized by an eight-stranded beta-barrel protein with a shallow "basin" at one end of the barrel and an alpha-helix stacked on the opposite end. 
UNLABELLED: The syphilis spirochete Treponema pallidum is an important human pathogen but a highly enigmatic bacterium that cannot be cultivated in vitro. T. pallidum lacks many biosynthetic pathways and therefore has evolved the capability to exploit host-derived metabolites via its periplasmic lipoprotein repertoire. We recently reported a flavin-trafficking protein in T. pallidum (Ftp_Tp; TP0796) as the first bacterial metal-dependent flavin adenine dinucleotide (FAD) pyrophosphatase that hydrolyzes FAD into AMP and flavin mononucleotide (FMN) in the spirochete's periplasm. However, orthologs of Ftp_Tp from other bacteria appear to lack this hydrolytic activity; rather, they bind and flavinylate subunits of a cytoplasmic membrane redox system (Nqr/Rnf). To further explore this dichotomy, biochemical analyses, protein crystallography, and structure-based mutagenesis were used to show that a single amino acid change (N55Y) in Ftp_Tp converts it from an Mg(2+)-dependent FAD pyrophosphatase to an FAD-binding protein. We also demonstrated that Ftp_Tp has a second enzymatic activity (Mg(2+)-FMN transferase); it flavinylates protein(s) covalently with FMN on a threonine side chain of an appropriate sequence motif using FAD as the substrate. Moreover, mutation of a metal-binding residue (D284A) eliminates Ftp_Tp's dual activities, thereby underscoring the role of Mg(2+) in the enzyme-catalyzed reactions. The posttranslational flavinylation activity that can target a periplasmic lipoprotein (TP0171) has not previously been described. The observed activities reveal the catalytic flexibility of a treponemal protein to perform multiple functions. Together, these findings imply mechanisms by which a dynamic pool of flavin cofactor is maintained and how flavoproteins are generated by Ftp_Tp locally in the T. pallidum periplasm. IMPORTANCE: Treponema pallidum, the syphilis spirochete, exploits its periplasmic lipoproteins for a number of essential physiologic processes. One of these, flavin-trafficking protein (Ftp), not only exploits its catalytic center to mediate posttranslational flavinylation of proteins (to create flavoproteins) but also likely maintains the periplasmic flavin pool via its unique ability to hydrolyze FAD. This functional diversity within a single lipoprotein is quite remarkable and reflects the enzymatic versatility of the treponemal lipoproteins, as well as molecular parsimony in an organism with a limited genome. Ftp-mediated protein flavinylation in the periplasm also likely is a key aspect of a predicted flavin-dependent Rnf-based redox homeostasis system at the cytoplasmic membrane of T. pallidum. In addition to its importance in T. pallidum physiology, Ftp homologs exist in other bacteria, thereby expanding our understanding of the bacterial periplasm as a metabolically active subcellular compartment for flavoprotein biogenesis as well as flavin homeostasis.-##-study to elucidate role of the active center of Ftp_Tp in Mg2+-dependent FAD hydrolysis and in potential FMN transferase activities; findings imply mechanisms by which a dynamic pool of flavin cofactor is maintained and how flavoproteins are generated by Ftp_Tp locally in the periplasm 
Treponema pallidum subsp. pallidum, the causative agent of syphilis, is a highly invasive spirochete pathogen that uses the vasculature to disseminate throughout the body. Identification of bacterial factors promoting dissemination is crucial for syphilis vaccine development. An important step in dissemination is bacterial adhesion to blood vessel surfaces, a process mediated by bacterial proteins that can withstand forces imposed on adhesive bonds by blood flow (vascular adhesins). The study of T. pallidum vascular adhesins is hindered by the uncultivable nature of this pathogen. We overcame these limitations by expressing T. pallidum adhesin Tp0751 (pallilysin) in an adhesion-attenuated strain of the cultivable spirochete Borrelia burgdorferi. Under fluid shear stress representative of conditions in postcapillary venules, Tp0751 restored bacterial-vascular interactions to levels similar to those observed for infectious B. burgdorferi and a gain-of-function strain expressing B. burgdorferi vascular adhesin BBK32. The strength and stability of Tp0751- and BBK32-dependent endothelial interactions under physiological shear stress were similar, although the mechanisms stabilizing these interactions were distinct. Tp0751 expression also permitted bacteria to interact with postcapillary venules in live mice as effectively as BBK32-expressing strains. These results demonstrate that Tp0751 can function as a vascular adhesin.-##-Tp0751 can function as a vascular adhesin.
Previously, we determined the crystal structure of apo-TpMglB-2, a d-glucose-binding component of a putative ABC transporter from the syphilis spirochete Treponema pallidum. The protein had an unusual topology for this class of proteins, raising the question of whether the d-glucose-binding mode would be different in TpMglB-2. Here, we present the crystal structures of a variant of TpMglB-2 with and without d-glucose bound. The structures demonstrate that, despite its aberrant topology, the protein undergoes conformational changes and binds d-glucose similarly to other Mgl-type proteins, likely facilitating d-glucose uptake in T. pallidum.-##-Crystal stuctures of MglB-2 reveals glucose-induced conformational changes.
Pathogenic Leptospiraspecies express immunoglobulin-like proteins which serve as adhesins to bind to the extracellular matrices of host cells. Leptospiral immunoglobulin-like protein A (LigA), a surface exposed protein containing tandem repeats of bacterial immunoglobulin-like (Big) domains, has been proved to be involved in the interaction of pathogenic Leptospira with mammalian host. In this study, the solution structure of the fourth Big domain of LigA (LigA4 Big domain) from Leptospira interrogans was solved by nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR). The structure of LigA4 Big domain displays a similar bacterial immunoglobulin-like fold compared with other Big domains, implying some common structural aspects of Big domain family. On the other hand, it displays some structural characteristics significantly different from classic Ig-like domain. Furthermore, Stains-all assay and NMR chemical shift perturbation revealed the Ca(2+) binding property of LigA4 Big domain. -##-Solution structure of leptospiral immunoglobulin-like protein A (LigA4 Big domain) has been presented. 
The complement system consists of more than 40 proteins that participate in the inflammatory response and in pathogen killing. Complement inhibitors are necessary to avoid the excessive consumption and activation of this system on host cells. Leptospirosis is a worldwide zoonosis caused by spirochetes from the genus Leptospira. Pathogenic leptospires are able to escape from complement activation by binding to host complement inhibitors Factor H [FH] and C4b-binding protein (C4BP) while non-pathogenic leptospires are rapidly killed in the presence of fresh serum. In this study, we demonstrate that complement control protein domains (CCP) 7 and 8 of C4BP α-chain interact with the outer membrane proteins LcpA, LigA and LigB from the pathogenic leptospire L. interrogans. The interaction between C4BP and LcpA, LigA and LigB is sensitive to ionic strength and inhibited by heparin. We fine mapped the LigA and LigB domains involved in its binding to C4BP and heparin and found that both interactions are mediated through the bacterial immunoglobulin-like (Big) domains 7 and 8 (LigA7-8 and LigB7-8) of both LigA and LigB and also through LigB9-10. Therefore, C4BP and heparin may share the same binding sites on Lig proteins. -##-The interaction between C4BP and Leptospira interrogans LcpA, LigA and LigB is sensitive to ionic strength and inhibited by heparin.
The identification of potential vaccine candidates against leptospirosis remains a challenge. However, one such candidate is OmpL37, a potentially surface-exposed antigen that has the highest elastin-binding ability described to date, suggesting that it plays an important role in host colonization. In order to evaluate OmpL37's ability to induce a protective immune response, prime-boost, DNA and subunit vaccine strategies were tested in the hamster model of lethal leptospirosis. The humoral immune response was evaluated using an indirect ELISA test, and the cytokine profile in whole blood was determined by quantitative real-time PCR. Unlike the DNA vaccine, the administration of recombinant OmpL37 induced a strong IgG antibody response. When individually administrated, both formulations stimulated a TNF-α mediated inflammatory response. However, none of the OmpL37 formulations or vaccination strategies induced protective immunity. Further studies are required towards the identification of new vaccine targets against leptospirosis. -##-Unlike the DNA vaccine, the administration of recombinant OmpL37 induced a strong IgG antibody response. When individually administrated, both formulations stimulated a TNF-a mediated inflammatory response

The coagulation system provides a primitive but effective defense against hemorrhage. Soluble fibrinogen (Fg) monomers, composed of α, β and γ chains, are recruited to provide structural support for the formation of a hemostatic plug. Fg binds to platelets and is processed into a cross-linked fibrin polymer by the enzymatic clotting factors, thrombin and Factor XIII (FXIII). The newly formed fibrin-platelet clot can act as barrier to protect against pathogens from entering the bloodstream. Further, injuries caused by bacterial infections can be confined to the initial wound site. Many pathogenic bacteria have Fg-binding adhesins that can circumvent the coagulation pathway and allow the bacteria to sidestep containment. Fg expression is upregulated during lung infection providing an attachment surface for bacteria with the ability to produce Fg-binding adhesins. Fg binding by leptospira might play a crucial factor in Leptospira-associated pulmonary hemorrhage, the main factor contributing to lethality in severe cases of leptospirosis. The 12th domain of Leptospira immunoglobulin-like protein B (LigB12), a leptospiral adhesin, interacts with the C-terminus of FgαC (FgαCC). In this study, the binding site for LigB12 was mapped to the final 23 amino acids at the C-terminal end of FgαCC (FgαCC8). The association of FgαCC8 with LigB12 (ELISA, KD = 0.76 μM; SPR, KD = 0.96 μM) was reduced by mutations of both charged residues (R608, R611 and H614 from FgαCC8; D1061 from LigB12) and hydrophobic residues (I613 from FgαCC8; F1054 and A1065 from LigB12). Additionally, LigB12 bound strongly to FXIII and also inhibited fibrin formation, suggesting that LigB can disrupt coagulation by suppressing FXIII activity. Here, the detailed binding mechanism of a leptospiral adhesin to a host hemostatic factor is characterized for the first time and should provide better insight into the pathogenesis of leptospirosis.-##-LigB bound to factor XIII and further interfered with the cross-linking of fibrinogen 
A previous study had demonstrated that Leptospira enolase is secreted extracellularly by a yet unknown mechanism and reassociates with the bacterial membrane. Surface-anchored leptospiral enolase displays plasminogen binding activity. In this work, we explored the consequences of this interaction and also assessed whether Leptospira enolase might display additional moonlighting functions by interacting with other host effector proteins. We first demonstrated that enolase-bound plasminogen is converted to its active form, plasmin. The protease plasmin targets human fibrinogen and vitronectin, but not the complement proteins C3b and C5. Leptospira enolase also acts as an immune evasion protein by interacting with the negative complement regulators C4b binding protein and factor H. Once bound to enolase, both regulators remain functional as cofactors of factor I, mediating cleavage of C4b and C3b. In conclusion, enolase may facilitate leptospiral survival and dissemination, thus contributing to bacterial virulence. The identification and characterization of moonlighting proteins is a growing field of bacterial pathogenesis, as these multifaceted proteins may represent potential future therapeutic targets to fight bacterial infections.-##-Leptospira enolase also acts as an immune evasion protein by interacting with the negative complement regulators C4b binding protein and factor H.Enolase may facilitate leptospiral survival and dissemination, thus contributing to bacterial virulence 
Leptospirosis is zoonotic and emerging infectious disease of global importance. Little is understood about Leptospira pathogenesis and host immune response. In the present work we have investigated how Leptospira modulates the host innate immune response mediated by Toll-like receptors (TLRs) via surface exposed proteins. We screened Leptospira outer membrane/surface proteins for their ability to activate/inhibit TLR2/4 signaling in HEK293 cell lines. Of these the 21 kDa Leptospira surface adhesin, Lsa21 had strong TLR2 and TLR4 activity leading to production of proinflammatory cytokines and expression of costimulatory molecules in mouse macrophages. This activity of Lsa21 on innate response was dependent on activation of mitogen activated protein kinases (MAPKs) via stimulating the rapid phosphorylation of p38, JNK and activation of transcription factor NF-κB. Additionally, neutralizing antibodies against TLR2 and TLR4 significantly inhibited cytokine secretion and attenuated Lsa21 induced phosphorylation of p38 and JNK. Furthermore, Lsa21 induced cytokine levels were significantly lower in TLR2-##-Lsa21 is a potent TLR2 and TLR4 agonist that induces strong innate response and may play important role in Leptospira pathogenesis 
The protein FcpA is a unique component of the flagellar filament of spirochete bacteria belonging to the genus Leptospira. Although it plays an essential role in translational motility and pathogenicity, no structures of FcpA homologues are currently available in the PDB. Its three-dimensional structure will unveil the novel motility mechanisms that render pathogenic Leptospira particularly efficient at invading and disseminating within their hosts, causing leptospirosis in humans and animals. FcpA from L. interrogans was purified and crystallized, but despite laborious attempts no useful X ray diffraction data could be obtained. This challenge was solved by expressing a close orthologue from the related saprophytic species L. biflexa. Three different crystal forms were obtained: a primitive and a centred monoclinic form, as well as a hexagonal variant. All forms diffracted X-rays to suitable resolutions for crystallographic analyses, with the hexagonal type typically reaching the highest limits of 2.0 Å and better. A variation of the quick-soaking procedure resulted in an iodide derivative that was instrumental for single-wavelength anomalous diffraction methods.-##-Crystallization of FcpA from Leptospira, a novel flagellar protein that is essential for pathogenesis. 
Leptospira interrogans serovar Copenhageni is a human pathogen that causes leptospirosis, a worldwide zoonosis. The L. interrogans genome codes for a wide array of potential diguanylate cyclase (DGC) enzymes with characteristic GGDEF domains capable of synthesizing the cyclic dinucleotide c-di-GMP, known to regulate transitions between different cellular behavioral states in bacteria. Among such enzymes, LIC13137 (Lcd1), which has an N-terminal cGMP-specific phosphodiesterases, adenylyl cyclases, and FhlA (GAF) domain and a C-terminal GGDEF domain, is notable for having close orthologs present only in pathogenic Leptospira species. Although the function and structure of GGDEF and GAF domains have been studied extensively separately, little is known about enzymes with the GAF-GGDEF architecture. In this report, we address the question of how the GAF domain regulates the DGC activity of Lcd1. The full-length Lcd1 and its GAF domain form dimers in solution. The GAF domain binds specifically cAMP (K-##-The full-length Lcd1 and its N-terminal cGMP-specific phosphodiesterases, adenylyl cyclases, and FhlA (GAF) domain form dimers in solution.
Leptospirosis caused by Leptospira is a zoonotic disease of global importance but it is considered as an emerging or re-emerging infectious disease in many areas in the world. Until now, the mechanisms about pathogenesis and transmission of Leptospira remains poorly understood. As eukaryotic and prokaryotic proteins can be denatured in adverse environments and chaperone-protease/peptidase complexes degrade these harmful proteins, we speculate that infection may also cause leptospiral protein denaturation, and the HslU and HslV proteins of L. interrogans may compose a complex to degrade denatured proteins that enhances leptospiral survival in hosts. Here we show that leptospiral HslUV is an ATP-dependent chaperone-peptidase complex containing ATPase associated with various cellular activity (AAA+) and N-terminal nucleophile (Ntn) hydrolase superfamily domains, respectively, which hydrolyzed casein and chymotrypsin-like substrates, and this hydrolysis was blocked by threonine protease inhibitors. The infection of J774A.1 macrophages caused the increase of leptospiral denatured protein aggresomes, but more aggresomes accumulated in hslUV gene-deleted mutant. The abundant denatured leptospiral proteins are involved in ribosomal structure, flagellar assembly, two-component signaling systems and transmembrane transport. Compared to the wild-type strain, infection of cells in vitro with the mutant resulted in a higher number of dead leptospires, less leptospiral colony-forming units and lower growth ability, but also displayed a lower half lethal dose, attenuated histopathological injury and decreased leptospiral loading in lungs, liver, kidneys, peripheral blood and urine in hamsters. Therefore, our findings confirmed that HslUV AAA+ chaperone-Ntn peptidase complex of L. interrogans contributes to leptospiral survival in hosts and transmission of leptospirosis.-##-These findings confirmed that HslUV AAA+ chaperone-Ntn peptidase complex of Leptospira interrogans contributes to leptospiral survival in hosts and transmission of leptospirosis.
Leptospirosis is a widespread zoonotic and neglected infectious disease of human and veterinary concern that is caused by pathogenic Leptospira species. After entrance in the host, pathogenic leptospires evade the host natural defense mechanisms in order to propagate and disseminate to multiple organs. Myeloperoxidase is an enzyme stored in neutrophils azurophilic granules, and is released upon neutrophil activation to produce mainly hypochlorous acid, a strong oxidant and potent antimicrobial agent. In the present investigation, we studied the modulation of myeloperoxidase activity by L. interrogans serovar Copenhageni. We show that leptospires and their culture supernatants are able to inhibit both peroxidase and chlorination activities of myeloperoxidase, without interfering with neutrophil degranulation. By leptospiral outer membrane protein extraction and fractionation, we identified the proteins LipL21 and LipL45 as myeloperoxidase inhibitors, constituting new Leptospira virulence factors. Accordingly, we propose a function for the protein LipL21, one of the most expressed leptospiral outer membrane proteins. Our results show a novel innate immune evasion mechanism by which leptospires interfere with the host response in order to cope with the host oxidative stress and efficiently achieve dissemination and colonization.-##-By leptospiral outer membrane protein extraction and fractionation, the authors identified the proteins LipL21 and LipL45 as myeloperoxidase inhibitors, constituting new Leptospira virulence factors.
Leptospira spp. are spirochete bacteria that possess periplasmic flagella (PFs) underneath the outer membrane; each flagellum is attached to each end of the protoplasmic cylinder. PFs of Leptospira have a coiled shape that bends the end of the cell body. However, the molecular mechanism by which multiple flagellar proteins organize to form the distinctively curled PF of Leptospira remains unclear. Here we obtained a slow-motility mutant of L. biflexa MD4-3 by random insertion mutagenesis using a Himar1 transposon. In MD4-3, the gene encoding the flagellar sheath protein, flagellar-coiling protein A (FcpA), which was recently identified in L. interrogans, was inactivated. As with L. interrogans ΔfcpA strains, the L. biflexa ΔfcpA strain lacked a distinct curvature at both ends of the cell body, and its motility was significantly reduced as compared with that of the wild-type strain. PFs isolated from the ΔfcpA strain were straight and were thinner than those isolated from the wild-type strain. Western blot analysis revealed that flagellar proteins FlaA1, FlaA2, FlaB1, and FlaB2 were expressed in the ΔfcpA strain but the flagellar proteins, except for FlaB2 were not incorporated in its PFs. Immunoprecipitation assay using anti-FcpA antiserum demonstrated that FcpA associates with FlaA2 and FlaB1. The association between FcpA and FlaA2 was also verified using pull-down assay. The regions of FlaA2 and FlaB1 interacting with FcpA were determined using a bacterial two-hybrid assay. These results suggest that FcpA together with FlaA2, produces coiling of PF of the Leptospira, and the interaction between the sheath and core filament may be mediated by FcpA and FlaB1.-##-FcpA together with FlaA2, produces coiling of periplasmic flagella of Leptospira, and the interaction between the sheath and core filament may be mediated by FcpA and FlaB1 
Bacterial ClpB is an ATP-dependent Hsp100 chaperone that reactivates aggregated proteins in cooperation with the DnaK chaperone system and promotes survival of bacteria under stress conditions. A large number of publications also indicate that ClpB supports the virulence of bacteria, including a pathogenic spirochaete -##-ClpB can support the virulence of L.interrogans by protecting the conformational integrity and catalytic activity of multiple metabolic enzymes, thus maintaining energy homeostasis in pathogen cells.
